Massachusetts, session 194th, H40.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 64E of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in lines 5 and 6, the words “and employing 
not more than 20 persons,”   
SECTION 2. Said section 64E of said chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following subsection:-   
  (g) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state treasurer, 
or designee, may seek to reduce operating expenses for the plan through private donations or 
grants, which may include direct and indirect fundraising.